Wyoming, session 2025, HB0017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-13-337(b)(intro) and (c) is
amended to read:
21-13-337. Career and technical education equipment
grants; application; criteria; limitations.
(b) A grant awarded under this section shall be for a
period of two (2) years and shall not exceed fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000.00) seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000.00) per year. Applications for a grant under this
section shall be submitted on a form and in a manner
specified by rule of the department, shall be filed with
the department on or before June 30 to secure a grant
during the immediately succeeding school year and shall at
a minimum include:
(c) Not later than August 15 of the applicable school
year and following review of applications submitted under
this section, the department shall notify applicant
districts of its grant awards and shall provide each
applicant district a written statement of the reasons for
approving or denying the application. No award shall be
given to a district unless it has expended, or will expend
with the award of the grant requested under this section,
the entire amount generated under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)
for supplies, materials and equipment for career and
technical education programs utilizing expenditure data
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0017
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
from the immediately preceding five (5) two (2) school
years from the date of application and amounts from the
special reserve fund created under W.S. 21-13-504 for
supplies, materials and equipment for career and technical
education programs. Further, Preference shall be given to
districts that have not received a grant under this section
in the immediately preceding five (5) school years from the
date of application. If an application is approved, the
department shall award the grant from amounts made
available by legislative appropriation from the public
school foundation program account for purposes of this
section.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0017
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3